California, session 20252026, SB32.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1367.029 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:1367.029. (a) On or before July 1, 2027, the department shall develop and adopt standards for the geographic accessibility of perinatal units to ensure timely access for enrollees. These standards shall be no longer in time or distance than those imposed for Medi-Cal managed care plans by county type adopted pursuant to Section 14197.03 of the Welfare and Institutions Code according to each plan’s applicable service area or areas.(b) The department shall consult with the State Department of Health Care Services, the Department of Insurance, and stakeholders in developing the standards. The departments shall consult with stakeholders representing the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, the California Hospital Association, consumers, health plans, labor, and other health care professionals who provide pediatric and pregnancy-related services, including, but not limited to, registered nurses, nurse midwives, and licensed midwives.(c) Pursuant to Section 1367.03, the department may authorize alternative access standards or issue waivers to plans for the standards adopted under this section.(d) For the purposes of this section, “perinatal unit” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 70545 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.(e) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2033, and, as of January 1, 2034, is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 10133.535 is added to the Insurance Code, to read:10133.535. (a) On or before July 1, 2027, the department shall develop and adopt standards for the geographic accessibility of perinatal units to ensure timely access for insureds. These standards shall be no longer in time or distance than those imposed for Medi-Cal managed care plans by county type adopted pursuant to Section 14197.03 of the Welfare and Institutions Code according to each plan’s applicable service area or areas.(b) The department shall consult with the State Department of Health Care Services, the Department of Managed Health Care, and stakeholders in developing the standards. The departments shall consult with stakeholders representing the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, the California Hospital Association, consumers, health plans, labor, and other health care professionals who provide pediatric and pregnancy-related services, including, but not limited to, registered nurses, nurse midwives, and licensed midwives.(c) The department may issue an exception to an insurer for the standards adopted under this section.(d) For the purposes of this section, “perinatal unit” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 70545 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.(e) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2033, and, as of January 1, 2034, is repealed.SEC. 3. Section 14197.03 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:14197.03. (a) On or before July 1, 2027, the department shall develop and adopt time and distance standards for perinatal units to ensure that covered benefits are accessible to enrollees.(b) The department shall consult with the Department of Managed Health Care, the Department of Insurance, and stakeholders in developing the standards. The departments shall consult with stakeholders representing the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, the California Hospital Association, consumers, health plans, labor, and other health care professionals who provide pediatric and pregnancy-related services, including, but not limited to, registered nurses, nurse midwives, and licensed midwives.(c) Pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 14197, the department may authorize alternative access standards for the standards adopted under this section.(d) For the purposes of this section, “perinatal unit” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 70545 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.(e) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2033, and, as of January 1, 2034, is repealed.SEC. 4. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.___________________ CORRECTIONS: Heading—Last amended date. REVISIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________